Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4654.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 PART 1 LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the various state 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 departments and agencies, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch described in this part for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025 from the funds indicated in this part. The following is a summary of the appropriations in this part: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 465,900 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 465,900 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 465,900 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 465,900 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 465,900 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 465,900 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Disaster relief $ 465,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 465,900 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 465,900 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2024-2025 GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025, total state spending from state sources under part 1 is $465,900.00 and state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $465,900.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations made and expenditures authorized under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY Sec. 301. (1) It is the intent of the legislature that the state budget director uses the state budget director's authority under section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a, to lapse a total of $465,900.00 appropriated under 2020 PA 166 to the state general fund. The funding was appropriated for work project number 14311, appropriation/fund number TW4591321, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 and was allocated for disaster relief. (2) Funds appropriated in part 1 from work project lapse funds must be made available for expenditures for continued disaster relief in a county with a population of between 8,000 and 9,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census. (3) Unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for disaster relief are designated as a work project appropriation. Unencumbered or unallotted funds must not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and must be available for expenditures under this section until the project has been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to provide disaster relief from flooding that occurred in May 2025. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees, contracts with vendors, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $465,900.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2027.